Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of  this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 105.100 to
105.168.
Enrolled Senate Bill 690 (SB 690-B) Page 1
SECTION 2. (1) As used in  this section, “health-related social needs housing supports”
means housing supports approved  for the demonstration project under 42 U.S.C. 1315 by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(2) In an action for possession based  on nonpayment, as defined in ORS 90.395, a de-
fendant may move the court to  reschedule the trial supported by a motion and declaration
under penalty of perjury that the person:
(a) Is the parent of a child under 12 months of age who is living in the dwelling unit;
(b) Is a recipient of medical assistance, as defined in ORS 414.025;
(c) Was approved, on a date of approval specified in the declaration, by the Oregon Health
Authority or a coordinated  care organization, as defined in ORS 414.025, to receive health-
related social needs housing supports; and
(d) Delivered documentation to the plaintiff as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) On or before filing a motion and declaration  under subsection (2) of this section, the
defendant shall deliver to the plaintiff a copy of an  award letter or any other documentation
showing approval for health-related social needs housing  supports. The defendant may
redact the names of any medical providers, Oregon Health Plan member  identification num-
bers or other protected personal information, not including the  defendant’s name or contact
information, that appears in the documentation.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 105.137  (6), a court shall grant the motion and shall reschedule
the trial to a date no sooner than 90  days and no later than 104 days from the date of the
motion if:
(a) The motion and  declaration under subsection (2) of this section are filed at least three
judicial days prior to the date set for trial, unless good cause is shown; and
(b) The court finds that the requirements of subsection (2) of this section are met.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on September 28, 2027.
SECTION 4.  ORS 105.136 is amended to read:
105.136. (1) The Judicial Department, in  consultation with the Housing and Community Services
Department, shall supply and may regularly update the  notice required under ORS 90.395 (2) and
105.135 (2)(d). The notice must be in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
THIS IS AN  IMPORTANT NOTICE OF WHERE TO GET HELP IF YOU ARE FACING PO-
TENTIAL EVICTION FOR NONPAYMENT.
For information in  Spanish, Korean, Russian, Vietnamese or Chinese, go to the Judicial De-
partment website at 
.
You must comply with deadlines identified in  a notice of nonpayment, or you risk losing your
housing.
Rental assistance and support services may be available. Dial 2-1-1 or  go to www.211info.org or
contact a local service provider at .
If you have a child under 1 year old living with you  and you have been approved for rent
assistance through Medicaid, you  may be able to delay the eviction. See  for
more information.
Low-income tenants may be able to receive free or low-cost legal advice by contacting  a legal
aid organization. Go to to find an office near you.
The Oregon State Bar provides information about legal  assistance programs at
.
Enrolled Senate Bill 690 (SB 690-B) Page 2
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(2) The Judicial Department shall translate the completed form under subsection (1) of  this
section into the Spanish,  Korean, Russian, Vietnamese and Chinese languages and shall display links
to the English and translated forms prominently on the department’s website.
(3) Each form  on the Judicial Department website under subsection (2) of this section must in-
clude a statement  in English, Spanish, Korean, Russian, Vietnamese and Chinese indicating that the
form and translations can be  found on the Judicial Department website and providing the web ad-
dress where the forms may be found.
SECTION 5. (1) Section 2 of  this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 105.136 by section
4 of this 2025 Act become operative on September 1, 2025.
(2) The Judicial Department may take any action before the operative date specified in
subsection (1) of this section that is necessary for the Judicial Department to exercise,  on
and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this  section, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the Judicial  Department by section 2 of this 2025 Act and
the amendments to ORS 105.136 by section 4 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.  ORS 105.136, as amended by section 4 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
105.136. (1) The Judicial Department, in  consultation with the Housing and Community Services
Department, shall supply and may regularly update the  notice required under ORS 90.395 (2) and
105.135 (2)(d). The notice must be in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
THIS IS AN  IMPORTANT NOTICE OF WHERE TO GET HELP IF YOU ARE FACING PO-
TENTIAL EVICTION FOR NONPAYMENT.
For information in  Spanish, Korean, Russian, Vietnamese or Chinese, go to the Judicial De-
partment website at 
.
You must comply with deadlines identified in  a notice of nonpayment, or you risk losing your
housing.
Rental assistance and support services may be available. Dial 2-1-1 or  go to www.211info.org or
contact a local service provider at .
[If you have a child under 1 year  old living with you and you have been approved for rent as-
sistance through Medicaid, you may be able to delay the eviction. See  for more in-
formation.]
Low-income tenants may  be able to receive free or low-cost legal advice by contacting a legal
aid organization. Go to to find an office near you.
The Oregon State Bar  provides information about legal assistance programs at
.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(2) The Judicial Department shall translate the completed form under subsection (1) of  this
section into the Spanish,  Korean, Russian, Vietnamese and Chinese languages and shall display links
to the English and translated forms prominently on the department’s website.
(3) Each form  on the Judicial Department website under subsection (2) of this section must in-
clude a statement  in English, Spanish, Korean, Russian, Vietnamese and Chinese indicating that the
form and translations can be  found on the Judicial Department website and providing the web ad-
dress where the forms may be found.
Enrolled Senate Bill 690 (SB 690-B) Page 3
SECTION 7. The amendments to ORS 105.136 by  section 6 of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on September 28, 2027.
SECTION 8. Section 9 of  this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 456.548 to
456.725.
SECTION 9. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall prioritize,
whenever possible in the department’s  discretion, families with children under 12 months of
age, in adopting rules or policies  to implement or administer programs that serve to promote
housing stabilization for  people experiencing homelessness or who are at risk of becoming
homeless.
(2) On  or before September 15 of each year, the department shall submit a report in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly re-
lated to housing on the rate of unsheltered homelessness among children in this state.
SECTION 10. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 17, 2025
Repassed by Senate June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 690 (SB 690-B) Page 4